Washington statutes.
RCW 35.66.050

Persons under arrest—Separate quarters.

For the purpose of effecting the main object of this chapter, no member of one sex under arrest shall be confined in the same cell or apartment of the city jail or prison, with any member of the other sex whatever.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 53; 1965 c 7 s 35.66.050. Prior: 1893 c 15 s 3; RRS s 9284.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.